Vermont, session 2025-2026, S295.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 455 is amended to read:
§ 455. DEFINITIONS
(a) As used in this subchapter:
* * *
(9) “Employee” shall mean means:
(A) Any regular officer or employee of the Vermont Historical
Society or a department other than a person included under subdivision (B) of
this subdivision (9), who is employed for not less than 40 calendar weeks in a
VT LEG #386030 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.295
2026 Page 2 of 8
year. “Employee” includes deputy State’s Attorneys, victim advocates
employed by a State’s Attorney pursuant to 13 V.S.A. § 5306, secretaries
employed by a State’s Attorney pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 1185, and other
positions created within the State’s Attorneys’ offices that meet the eligibility
requirements for membership in the Retirement System.
(B) Any regular officer or employee of the Department of Public
Safety assigned to police and law enforcement duties, including the
Commissioner of Public Safety appointed before July 1, 2001; but, irrespective
of the member’s classification, shall does not include any member of the
General Assembly as such, any person who is covered by the Vermont
Teachers’ Retirement System, any person engaged under retainer or special
agreement or Group C beneficiary employed by the Department of Public
Safety for not more than 208 hours per year, or any person whose principal
source of income is other than State employment. In all cases of doubt, the
Retirement Board shall determine whether any person is an employee as
defined in this subchapter. Also included under this subdivision (B) are
employees of the Department of Liquor and Lottery who exercise law
enforcement powers, employees of the Department of Fish and Wildlife
assigned to law enforcement duties, motor vehicle inspectors, full-time deputy
sheriffs compensated by the State of Vermont whose primary function is
transports, full-time members of the Capitol Police force, investigators
VT LEG #386030 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.295
2026 Page 3 of 8
employed by the Criminal Division of the Office of the Attorney General,
Department of State’s Attorneys, Department of Health, or Office of the
Secretary of State, who have attained Level III law enforcement officer
certification from the Vermont Criminal Justice Council, who are required to
perform law enforcement duties as the primary function of their employment,
and who may be subject to mandatory retirement permissible under 29 U.S.C.
§ 623(j), who are first included in membership of the system on or after July 1,
2000. Also included under this subdivision (B) are full-time firefighters
employed by the State of Vermont and the Defender General.
* * *
(11) “Member” means any employee included in the membership of the
Retirement System under section 457 of this title.
(A) “Group A members” means employees classified under
subdivision (9)(A) of this subsection (a).
(B) [Repealed.]
(C) “Group C members” means employees classified under
subdivision (9)(B) of this subsection (a) who become members as of the date
of establishment, any person who is first included in the membership of the
System on or after July 1, 1998, any person who was a Group B member on
June 30, 1998, who was in service on that date, and any person who was a
VT LEG #386030 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.295
2026 Page 4 of 8
Group B member on June 30, 1998, who was absent from service on that date
who returns to service on or after July 1, 1998.
(D) “Group D members” means Justices of the Supreme Court,
Superior judges, district judges, environmental judges, and probate judges.
(E) “Group F member” means any person who is first included in the
membership of the System on or after January 1, 1991, any person who was a
Group E member on December 31, 1990, who was in service on that date, and
any person who was a Group E member on December 31, 1990, who was
absent from service on that date who returns to service on or after January 1,
1991.
(F) “Group G member” means:
(i) the following employees who are first employed in the
positions listed in this subdivision (F)(i) on or after July 1, 2023, or who are
members of the System as of June 30, 2022, and make an irrevocable election
to prospectively join Group G on or before June 30, 2023, pursuant to the
terms set by the Board: facility employees of the Department of Corrections,
as Department of Corrections employees who provide direct security and
treatment services to offenders under supervision in the community, employees
of a facility for justice-involved youth, and employees of the Vermont
Psychiatric Care Hospital or its successor in interest, who provide direct
patient care; and
VT LEG #386030 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.295
2026 Page 5 of 8
(ii) the following employees who are first employed in the
positions listed in this subdivision (F)(ii) or first included in the membership of
the System on or after January 1, 2025, or who are members of the System as
of December 31, 2024, and make an irrevocable election to join Group G on or
before December 31, 2024, pursuant to the terms set by the Board:
(I) all sheriffs; and
(II) deputy sheriffs who:
(aa) are employed by county sheriff’s departments that
participate in the Vermont Employees’ Retirement System;
(bb) have attained Level II or Level III law enforcement
officer certification from the Vermont Criminal Justice Council;
(cc) are required to perform law enforcement duties as the
primary function of their employment; and
(dd) are not full-time deputy sheriffs compensated by the
State of Vermont whose primary function is transports as defined in 24 V.S.A.
§ 290(b) and eligible for Group C pursuant to subdivision (9)(B) of this
subsection (a); and
(iii) the following employees who are first employed in the
positions listed in this subdivision (F)(iii) or first included in the membership
of the System on or after July 1, 2026, or who are members of the System as of
June 30, 2026, and make an irrevocable election to prospectively join Group G
VT LEG #386030 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.295
2026 Page 6 of 8
on or before June 30, 2027, pursuant to the terms set by the Board: classified
employees of the Department for Children and Families; fire academy site
coordinators within the Division of Fire Safety; assistant State fire marshals
within the Division of Fire Safety; force protection officers with the Military
Department; and law enforcement certification and training coordinators
within the Vermont Police Academy.
* * *
Sec. 2. 3 V.S.A. § 461 is amended to read:
§ 461. ACCIDENTAL AND OCCUPATIONALLY RELATED
DISABILITY RETIREMENT
(a) Upon the application of a member or of his or her the member’s
department head not later than 90 days, or longer for cause shown, after the
date the member may have separated from service, any member may be retired
by the Retirement Board on an accidental disability retirement allowance, not
less than 30 nor more than 90 days after filing such application, provided that
the Retirement Board shall find on the basis of such evidence as may come
before it, including a report by the Medical Board after a medical examination
of such member, that the member is mentally or physically incapacitated for
the further performance of duty as the natural and proximate result of an
accident occurring at a definite time and place during the course of his or her
the member’s performance of duty as an employee, that such accident was not
VT LEG #386030 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.295
2026 Page 7 of 8
the result of his or her the member’s gross negligence or willful misconduct,
and provided that the Medical Board shall certify that such incapacity is likely
to be permanent, and that the member should be retired. The Retirement Board
may consult with a certified vocational rehabilitation counselor in determining
whether the individual is incapacitated for the further performance of duty.
(b) Upon accidental disability retirement, a member shall receive a normal
retirement allowance if he or she shall have reached his or her normal
retirement date; otherwise, such a member shall receive a retirement allowance
that shall be equal to:
(1) a normal retirement allowance payable at normal retirement date,
based on the member’s average final compensation at disability retirement and
the number of years of creditable service the member would have completed
had the member remained in service to his or her normal retirement date;
multiplied by
(2) the ratio that the number of the member’s years of creditable service
at disability bears to the number of years of such service the member would
have completed had the member remained in service to his or her normal
retirement date; provided, however, that such allowance shall not be less than
25 percent of the member’s average final compensation at the time of the
member’s disability retirement.
VT LEG #386030 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.295
2026 Page 8 of 8
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, a Group C member,
upon accidental disability retirement, shall receive as a minimum an allowance
that will, when added to the member’s Social Security benefit, be equal to 50
percent of the member’s average final compensation plus 10 percent of the
member’s average final compensation for each dependent child, not in excess
of three, who has not attained age 18 years of age or, if a dependent student,
has not attained age 23 years of age.
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (b) or (c) of this section, a member may not
receive more than 50 percent of his or her the member’s average final
compensation at the time of his or her the member’s disability retirement.
Sec. 3. 3 V.S.A. chapter 16, subchapter 3 is amended to read:
Subchapter 3. Transfers Between or Within Retirement Systems
* * *
§ 496. TRANSFER FROM GROUP F TO GROUP G; ELECTION
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any Group F member who takes a
position subjecting that individual to membership in Group G may, within one
year after acceptance of the position subjecting the individual to Group G
membership, elect to remain as a Group F member and shall notify the
Retirement Board of the election.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386030 v.1